Connecticut, session 2026, SB00350.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 31-102 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) There shall continue to be in the Labor Department the
Connecticut State Board of Labor Relations, which shall be composed of
three members. On or before June first in the odd-numbered years, as
the term of each member expires, the Governor shall, with the advice
and consent of the General Assembly, appoint a successor to serve for a
term of six years. Each member of the board shall have been an elector
in this state for at least one year next preceding his appointment. Any
member may be removed by the Governor for cause shown in a public
hearing after the accused has been given a copy of the charges made and
has had an opportunity to answer such charges. The Governor shall fill
SB350 / File No. 210 1

SB350 File No. 210
any vacancy by appointment for the unexpired term. No member shall
receive a salary but each member shall be paid [one hundred fifty] three
hundred dollars in lieu of expenses for each day during which he is
engaged in the duties of the board. The offices of the board shall be in
the department at Wethersfield. The board is authorized to hold
hearings at any place in this state. Subject to the provisions of chapter
67, the board shall appoint such employees, including an assistant to the
agent, for such periods as may be necessary to carry out the work of the
board and the provisions of this chapter without undue delay. All files,
records and documents accumulated by the board shall be kept in
offices provided by the department. All decisions shall be made by a
majority of the board and a copy shall be filed with the commissioner.
As provided in section 4-60 and more frequently if required by the
governor, the board shall make a written report to the Governor, a copy
of which shall be filed with the commissioner.
Sec. 2. Section 31-98 of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The panel, or its single member if sitting in accordance with
section 31-93, may, in its discretion and with the consent of the parties,
issue an oral decision immediately upon conclusion of the proceedings.
If the decision is to be in writing, it shall be signed, within fifteen days,
by a majority of the members of the panel or by the single member so
sitting, and the decision shall state such details as will clearly show the
nature of the decision and the points disposed of by the panel. Where
the decision is in writing, one copy thereof shall be filed by the panel in
the office of the town clerk in the town where the controversy arose and
one copy shall be given to each of the parties to the controversy. The
panel or single member which has rendered an oral decision
immediately upon conclusion of the proceedings shall submit a written
copy of the decision to each party within fifteen days from the issuance
of such oral decision. In all cases where a decision is rendered orally
from the bench, the secretary shall cause such oral decision to be
transcribed, approved by the panel or single member as applicable and
filed with the records of the board proceedings.
SB350 / File No. 210 2

SB350 File No. 210
(b) Upon the conclusion of the proceedings, each member of the panel
shall receive [three hundred twenty-five] five hundred dollars and a
panel member who prepares a written decision shall receive an
additional [five hundred] one thousand dollars, or the single member,
if sitting in accordance with section 31-93, shall receive [three hundred
twenty-five] five hundred dollars, provided if the proceedings extend
beyond one day, each member shall receive [three hundred twenty-five]
five hundred dollars for each additional day beyond the first day, and
provided further no proceeding may be extended beyond two days
without the prior approval of the Labor Commissioner for each such
additional day.
(c) Upon the conclusion of an executive panel session, each member
of such panel shall receive [two] three hundred dollars.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 31-102(a)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 31-98
LAB Joint Favorable
SB350 / File No. 210 3

SB350 File No. 210
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Labor Dept. GF - Cost 280,500 374,000
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which increases compensation for members of the State
Board of Labor Relations (SBLR) and State Board of Mediation and
Arbitration (SBMA), results in the fiscal impacts outlined below.
Section 1 increases the per diem rate paid to members of the SBLR
from $150 to $300 for each day during which they are engaged in board
duties. This results in a General Fund cost to the Department of Labor
(DOL) of $48,000 in FY 27 (partial year cost) and $64,000 in FY 28. This
is based on data from DOL indicating there were 119 days, on average
between FY 22 and FY 24, in which members were engaged in duties of
the board and $64,000 on average was provided annually as per diem
payments during the same time period.
Section 2 increases the compensation paid to members of the SBMA
for (1) attended proceedings, (2) preparation of written decisions, (3)
proceedings extending beyond the first day, and (4) executive panel
sessions. This results in a General Fund cost to the DOL of $232,500 in
FY 27 (partial year cost) and $310,000 in FY 28. This is based on data
from DOL indicating there were 471 proceeding days1, 75 written
decisions, and 238 executive panel sessions on average between FY 22
Includes proceeding days that extended beyond the first day.
SB350 / File No. 210 4

SB350 File No. 210
to FY 24.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the fluctuation of days in which SBLR
members are engaged in board duties, number of SBMA proceedings,
written decisions, and executive panel sessions.
SB350 / File No. 210 5

SB350 File No. 210
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 350
AN ACT INCREASING THE PER DIEM RATE FOR MEMBERS OF
THE STATE BOARD OF LABOR RELATIONS AND COMPENSATION
FOR MEMBERS OF THE BOARD OF MEDIATION AND
ARBITRATION.